Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-417
Fresh pursuit; procedure after arrest.

If an arrest is made in this state by an officer of another state in accordance with the provisions of section 29-416, he shall without unnecessary delay take the person arrested before a magistrate of the county in which the arrest was made, who shall conduct a hearing for the purpose of determining the lawfulness of the arrest. If the magistrate determines that the arrest was lawful he shall commit the person arrested to await for a reasonable time the issuance of an extradition warrant by the Governor of this state. If the magistrate determines that the arrest was unlawful he shall discharge the person arrested.

Laws 1937, c. 70, § 2, p. 256;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 29-417;

R.S.1943, § 29-417.

This section outlines procedure to be followed after arrest made in fresh pursuit. State v. Goff, 174 Neb. 548, 118 N.W.2d 625 (1962).